Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Part 1 Counties Generally
5-1-120. Power to regulate stray animals.

Counties, by resolution of their respective legislative bodies, may license and regulate dogs and cats, establish and operate shelters and other animal control facilities, and regulate, capture, impound and dispose of stray dogs, stray cats and other stray animals.

Acts 1995, ch. 264, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 264, § 2 provided that it is not the intent of the general assembly in enacting that act to allow any county to prohibit or in any way impede any municipality in exercising any power or authority the municipality may lawfully exercise.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §§ 5-1-118(c)(1) and 5-1-120 implicitly authorize a county to regulate businesses that involve the keeping of dogs or cats and to charge a reasonable regulatory fee, OAG 06-161, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 181 (10/11/06).

5-1-121. Enforcement of county rules.

Counties, by resolution of their respective legislative bodies, may establish a monetary penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation of a rule or regulation that the county legislative body is authorized to adopt.

Acts 1995, ch. 264, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 264, § 2 provided that it is not the intent of the general assembly in enacting that act to allow any county to prohibit or in any way impede any municipality in exercising any power or authority the municipality may lawfully exercise.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of penalties imposed by county commission for resolution violation, OAG 98-0145, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 145 (8/11/98).

County governments may institute and collect civil penalties up to five hundred dollars per violation for permit or zoning violations, OAG 07-028, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 28 (3/12/07).

5-1-122. Exclusion of agricultural buildings.

The powers granted to counties by this part do not include the regulation of buildings used primarily for agricultural purposes; it being the intent of the general assembly that the powers granted to counties by this part should not be used to inhibit normal agricultural activities.

Acts 1995, ch. 264, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. The definition of “agriculture” in T.C. A. §§ 1-3-105(a)(2)(A) and 43-1-113(b)(1) applies in determining the meaning of “agricultural” as used in T.C.A. § 5-1-118(b), T.C.A. § 5-1-122, and T.C.A. § 13-7-114. AG LEXIS 35 (7/26/2017).

Based on the applicable definitions of “agriculture” and “agricultural,” concentrated animal feeding operations (CAFOs) clearly involve “agricultural” activities and the “agricultural” use of land and structures. Thus, a county is not authorized to regulate CAFOs under its zoning powers or its general powers. T.C.A. § 44-18-104 merely sets forth which zoning requirements and regulations apply when determining whether a feedlot, dairy farm, or poultry production house is to be afforded absolute immunity from a nuisance claim, but it does not provide authority for a county to enact zoning requirements or regulations. T.C.A. § 13-7-114, which prevents counties from using their zoning power to regulate structures and land used for agricultural purposes, is not in conflict with T.C.A. § 44-18-104 because there is no independent source of zoning power bestowed upon any local entity under this right-to-farm law. T.C.A § 44-18-104(b) and (d) do not direct compliance with the section when no zoning requirements or regulations exist. When no zoning requirements or regulations exist, these provisions convey that a person’s compliance with the section is deemed to be established as a matter of law. OAG 18-30, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 29 (7/6/2018).

5-1-123. General sessions court empowered to enforce county rules.

The general sessions court or court exercising the powers of a general sessions court in any county has jurisdiction of matters related to §§ 5-1-118 — 5-1-123, and has the power to enforce regulations and resolutions by which counties may exercise authority under this part. In the event of a conflict between a regulation or resolution of a county made pursuant to this part and an ordinance or regulation of any municipality in the county, such conflict shall be resolved in favor of the municipality with respect to persons and property within the municipality.

Acts 1995, ch. 264, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 264, § 2 provided that it is not the intent of the general assembly in enacting that act to allow any county to prohibit or in any way impede any municipality in exercising any power or authority the municipality may lawfully exercise.

5-1-124. County hospitals — Authority to enter into contracts and agreements.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any county that owns and operates a hospital is authorized to enter into any contract or agreement that any privately owned hospital operating under title 68 is authorized to enter into, including, but not limited to, agreements authorized by title 68, chapter 11, part 13, and Acts 1995, ch. 466.

Acts 1996, ch. 791, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 466, referred to in this section, amended and enacted numerous sections in titles 63 and 68. See the Session Laws Disposition Table in Volume 13.

5-1-125. County officials or employees prohibited from purchasing surplus property except at public auction — Penalty.

It is hereby declared unlawful for any county official or employee to purchase from the county any property declared to be surplus by the county except by bid at public auction or competitive sealed bid during the tenure of such person's office or employment, or for six (6) months thereafter.

A purchaser who violates this section commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1998, ch. 1043, § 2; 2005, ch. 10, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

5-1-126. Requirements prior to employment with county.

A county may require all persons prior to employment with such county to:

Agree to the release of all investigative records to the county for the purpose of verifying the accuracy of criminal violation information contained on an employment application; and

Supply a fingerprint sample and submit to a criminal history records check to be conducted by the Tennessee bureau of investigation. In addition, to the extent permitted by federal law, and at the discretion of the county, a check of such prints may be made against records maintained by the federal bureau of investigation.

Any costs incurred by the Tennessee bureau of investigation or the federal bureau of investigation, as appropriate, in conducting such investigations of applicants shall be paid by the county requesting such investigation and information; provided, that the county may require an applicant to pay such costs if the applicant is offered and accepts a position with such county. Payment of such costs is to be made in accordance with § 38-6-103.

A county may establish the job titles or classifications to which the requirements of this section apply. Such classifications shall not supersede any mandatory fingerprint-based criminal history background requirements that may be applicable for any person who is seeking employment in a position in any program subject to licensure, approval or certification by any state agency.

Acts 2000, ch. 693, § 2.

Cross-References. Requirements prior to employment with municipality, § 6-54-129.

5-1-127. Charter of incorporation to be posted on Internet.

No later than January 1, 2009, every municipality and county, including any county having a charter form of government or metropolitan government, shall post its charter of incorporation, as most recently revised or amended, on a web site maintained by the municipality or county or on the web site maintained by the secretary of state, if the municipality or county does not have or maintain a web site.

Within three (3) months following any changes or revisions to the charter, the electronic language posted on the web site shall be corrected by the municipality or county to reflect such changes or revisions. The secretary of state is not responsible for maintaining the correct language of a charter, if the charter is posted on the web site maintained by the secretary of state.

Acts 2008, ch. 808, § 1.

5-1-128. Sale of surplus property by public auction includes sale by Internet auction.

When a county, including any county having a charter or metropolitan form of government, is required by any law or its charter to sell surplus property by public auction, “public auction” includes the sale by Internet auction.

Acts 2009, ch. 173, § 3.

5-1-129. Design review commission.

It is the intent of the general assembly that all appropriate actions should be taken to authorize the local legislative body in any county having a population of not less than one hundred sixty thousand six hundred (160,600) nor more than one hundred sixty thousand seven hundred (160,700), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census which has county-wide zoning to protect the manner in which growth and construction of buildings are regulated in areas of historical significance to a locality, the county and the state.

The county legislative body of a county to which subdivision (a)(1) applies may create a design review commission, referred to in this section as “DRC,” having the authority to develop general guidelines for the exterior appearance of and entrance to properties which are located in an area of historical significance to a locality, the county and the state. The only properties to which this section applies located in such area must be:

Nonresidential property; or

Multiple family residential property.

The county legislative body may designate the planning commission as the design review commission.

When developing the guidelines for the exterior appearance of and entrance to properties identified in subdivision (a)(2), the county legislative body or planning commission must obtain input from citizens living within the area as well as from persons who have an interest in and knowledge of preservation of historic buildings.

When the county creates a separate DRC, the county mayor or county executive or metropolitan mayor shall appoint the members of the DRC from residents of the county and shall strive to ensure that the membership is representative of the county as a whole, including, if possible, members with either architectural or engineering knowledge, or any other person having experience in nonresidential building.

If a municipality within a county has a planning region outside of its current corporate limits, and the municipality has a DRC that has adopted guidelines, then the county's DRC shall adopt the same guidelines as the municipality for that area within the municipality's planning region insofar as such guidelines meet the requirements of subsection (a).

The county DRC guidelines adopted pursuant to subsection (a) shall not apply within the corporate limits of any municipality unless the municipality adopts such county's DRC guidelines.

This section shall not apply to any agricultural buildings in the unincorporated area of the county.

The county DRC guidelines adopted pursuant to subsection (a) shall be subject to approval by the county legislative body. Once approved, county building permits issued pursuant to § 13-7-110 or similar law, shall be withheld for noncompliance with DRC guidelines.

Any property owner affected by the guidelines or the withholding of a building permit due to noncompliance with such adopted DRC guidelines may appeal a decision of the DRC or the county building commissioner or similar official to the county board of zoning appeals created pursuant to § 13-7-106, or similar law, for a final decision.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to “outdoor advertising” as defined in § 54-21-102.

Acts 2012, ch. 1034, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

5-1-130. Contracts and agreements of economic and community development program as public record.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, any contract or agreement, together with all supporting records and documentation, that obligates public funds as part of a county's economic and community development program to assist new and existing businesses and industries in locating or expanding in the county is a public record subject to title 10, chapter 7, part 5, and open for public inspection as of the date such contract or agreement is made available to members of the governing body. A governing body shall publicly disclose the proposed contract or agreement in a manner that would adequately notify and fairly inform the public of the proposed contract or agreement before voting on the proposal.

This section does not apply to trade secrets received or maintained by a county. All such trade secrets are confidential.

This section does not apply to company documents or records containing marketing information or capital plans that are provided to a county with the understanding that they are confidential. Any such document or record is confidential until such time as the provider thereof no longer requires its confidentiality.

As used in this section:

“Capital plans” means plans, feasibility studies, and similar research and information that will contribute to the identification of future business sites and capital investments;

“Marketing information” means marketing studies, marketing analyses, and similar research and information designed to identify potential customers and business relationships; and

“Trade secrets” means manufacturing processes, materials used in manufacturing processes, and costs associated with the manufacturing process of a person or company submitting information to a county relating to an opportunity to contract with the county.

Acts 2017, ch. 421, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 421, § 3. May 18, 2017.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

5-1-131. Term limits relative to persons serving without compensation.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a county legislative body may adopt a resolution by a majority vote prohibiting term limits for persons appointed to boards or commissions by the county mayor if the appointee serves without compensation, not including reimbursement for travel and expenses.

Acts 2018, ch. 761, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 761, § 2. April 19, 2018.

5-1-132. Prohibited regulation of business of person under 18 years of age.

As used in this section:

“Business” means any enterprise carried on for the purpose of gain or economic profit; and

“Gross receipts”:

Means all receipts from whatever sources derived before any deductions; and

Does not include tips, gratuities, or other amounts customarily assumed to be intended for the person who has served the customer or client.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a county shall not require a license, permit, or any other form of regulation for a business that:

Is operated solely by a person or persons under eighteen (18) years of age;

Is located on private property with the permission of the property owner; and

Generates gross receipts of three thousand dollars ($3,000) or less in a calendar year.

Acts 2019, ch. 210, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 210, § 3. July 1, 2019.